Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-118 Prohibition on rebates and
inducements. (a) No title insurer, controlled escrow company, or
underwritten title company shall:

(1) Pay to the insured or to any other person any
commission, any part of its premiums, fees or other charges; or any other
consideration as inducement or compensation for the referral of title business,
for performance of any escrow, or other service in connection with which a
title policy is issued;

(2) Make any rebate of any portion of the fee or
charge shown by the schedule required in section 431:20-120. For purposes of
this article, the amount by which any fee or charge is less than that called
for by the then currently effective schedule of fees and charges of the title
insurer is an unlawful rebate; or

(3) Quote any fee or make any charge for a title
policy to any person that is less than that currently available to others for
the same type of title policy in a like amount covering property in the same
county and involving the same factors as set forth in its then currently
effective schedule of fees and charges. Nothing in this article shall prohibit
bulk rates or special rates for customers of prescribed classes if the bulk or
special rates are provided for in the schedule.

(b) No title insurer shall issue any title
policy in any transaction in connection with which it or any person, who is a
controlled escrow company or underwritten title company by reason of its
relationship with such title insurer, has paid or contemplates paying any
commission in violation of subsection (a)(1) or, in connection with which it or
any such controlled escrow company or underwritten title company, has made or
contemplates making any unlawful rebate in violation of subsection (a)(2).

(c) No insured named in a title insurance
policy nor any other person may knowingly receive or accept, directly or
indirectly, any commission, rebate or inducement referred to in subsection (a).

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed
as prohibiting reasonable payments, other than for the referral of title
insurance business, for services actually rendered to a title insurer in
connection with title insurance business. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004,
c 122, §78]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next